sv: Fagottrörets skrapstil: Amerikansk (långt skrap); Holländsk; Fransk; Tysk; Långt skrap; Kort skrap; Övrigt
hr-HR: Stil struganja trske fagota: Američki (dugi rez); Nizozemski; Francuski; Njemački; Dugi rez; Kratki rez; Ostalo
pl: Styl skrobania stroika fagotu: Amerykański (long scrape); Holenderski; Francuski; Niemiecki; Long scrape; Short scrape; Inny
bg-BG: Стил на изстъргване на тръстиката на фагота: Американски (дълго изстъргване); Нидерландски; Френски; Немски; Дълго изстъргване; Късо изстъргване; Друго
en: Bassoon reed scrape style: American (long scrape); Dutch; French; German; Long scrape; Short scrape; Other
ko: 바순 리드 스크레이프 스타일: 아메리칸(롱 스크레이프); 더치; 프렌치; 저먼; 롱 스크레이프; 쇼트 스크레이프; 기타
hu: Fagottnád karcolási stílusa: Amerikai (hosszú faragású); Holland; Francia; Német; Hosszú faragású; Rövid faragású; Egyéb
de: Schabstil des Fagottrohrblatts: Amerikanisch (langer Anschnitt); Holländisch; Französisch; Deutsch; Langer Anschnitt; Kurzer Anschnitt; Sonstige
it: Stile raschiato dell'ancia del fagotto: Americano (raschiatura lunga); Olandese; Francese; Tedesco; Raschiatura lunga; Raschiatura corta; Altro
pt-PT: Estilo de raspagem da palheta do fagote: Americano (raspagem longa); Holandês; Francês; Alemão; Raspagem longa; Raspagem curta; Outro
nl: Fagotriet schraapstijl: Amerikaans (lange schraap); Nederlands; Frans; Duits; Lange schraap; Korte schraap; Overig
nb: Fagottrørskrapestil: Amerikansk (lang skraping); Nederlandsk; Fransk; Tysk; Lang skraping; Kort skraping; Annet
cs: Typ seříznutí plátku fagotu: Americký (dlouhý zástřih); Holandský; Francouzský; Německý; Dlouhý zástřih; Krátký zástřih; Jiné
sl-SI: Slog lističa jezička fagota: Ameriški (dolg strg); Nizozemski; Francoski; Nemški; Dolg strg; Kratek strg; Drugo
lt-LT: Fagoto liežuvėlio gremžimo tipas: Amerikietiškas (ilgas grandymas); Olandiškas; Prancūziškas; Vokiškas; Ilgas grandymas; Trumpas grandymas; Kita
th: รูปแบบการแต่งลิ้นเสียงของบาสซูน: อเมริกัน (Long scrape); ดัตช์; ฝรั่งเศส; เยอรมัน; Long scrape; Short scrape; อื่นๆ
fr: Style de grattage de l’anche de basson: Américain (grattage long); Néerlandais; Français; Allemand; Grattage long; Grattage court; Autre
tr: Fagot kamışı kazıma tipi: Amerikan (uzun kazıma); Hollanda; Fransız; Alman; Uzun kazıma; Kısa kazıma; Diğer
ja: ファゴットのリードをこするスタイル: アメリカン (ロングスクレープ); ダッチ; フレンチ; ジャーマン; ロングスクレープ; ショートスクレープ; その他
el: Στυλ ξυσίματος καλαμιού φαγκότου: Αμερικανικό (long scrape); Ολλανδικό; Γαλλικό; Γερμανικό; Long scrape; Short scrape; Άλλο
ro-RO: Stilul de răzuire al anciei fagotului: American (razuire lungă); Olandez; Francez; German; Razuire lungă; Razuire scurtă; Altele
vi: Kiểu mài lưỡi kèn bassoon: Kiểu Mỹ (cạo dài); Hà Lan; Pháp; Đức; Cạo dài; Cạo ngắn; Khác
pt-BR: Estilo de raspagem da palheta do fagote: Americano (raspagem longa); Holandês; Francês; Alemão; Raspagem longa; Raspagem curta; Outros
ru: Стиль обрезки трости фагота: Американский (длинный срез); Голландский; Французский; Немецкий; Длинный срез; Короткий срез; Другое
sk-SK: Štýl orezania fagotovej trstiny: Americký (dlhý rez); Holandský; Francúzsky; Nemecký; Dlhý rez; Krátky rez; Iný
zh-CN: 巴松管簧片刮奏风格: 美式（长刮面）; 荷兰式; 法式; 德式; 长刮面; 短刮面; 其他
es: Estilo de raspado de caña del fagot: Estilo americano (raspado largo); Holandés; Francés; Alemán; Raspado largo; Raspado corto; Otro
da: Skrabestil til fagotblad: Amerikansk (lang skrabning); Hollandsk; Fransk; Tysk; Lang skrabning; Kort skrabning; Andet
zh-TW: 低音管簧片削切樣式: 美式 (長刮); 荷式; 法式; 德式; 長刮; 短刮; 其他
fi: Fagotin ruokolehden vuolutyyli: Amerikkalainen (pitkä vuolu); Hollantilainen; Ranskalainen; Saksalainen; Pitkä vuolu; Lyhyt vuolu; Muu